public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
afanar/A
inalberar/A
aldir/A
alteriđar/A
inamidar/A
anelar/A
ansar/A
ardir/A
arenar/A
aromatiđar/A
asénter/A
adatar/A
aŧidar/A
autorar/A
inaxear/A
reavar/A
xbafarar/A
bajar/A
bakanar/A
inbalar/A
balegar/A
inbalonar/A
inbalsamar/A
balukar/A
bandiđar/A
banpar/A
xbarar/A
xbaraŧar/A
bardar/A
barlúxer/A
arbasar/A
inbastardir/A
dexbateđar/A
xbatolar/A
inbaular/A
xbavaŧar/A
xbaxukiar/A
rebekar/A
bendar/A
xberlefar/A
bestemar/A
beverar/A
xbiakar/A
xbianŧar/A
bibiatar/A
arbinar/A
xbingolar/A
inbironar/A
biskotar/A
bixegolar/A
xbocar/A
sobóɉer/A
dexbokar/A
bokonar/A
bonir/A
dexbonigolar/A
borondolar/A
inbotiliar/A
xboxemar/A
bramar/A
braŧar/A
inbriagar/A
xbrodacar/A
brovar/A
inbrunar/A
xbufar/A
busar/A
butar/A
xbuxolar/A
casar/A
acèñer/A
decéñer/A
cicolar/A
cokiđar/A
maledir/A
debutar/A
derenar/A
dialogar/A
kontradíxer/A
adolorar/A
redonar/A
indormenŧar/A
radreŧar/A
prodúxer/A
inđenocar/A
đornaliđar/A
edukar/A
rientrar/A
estínguer/A
exonerar/A
stupefar/A
falir/A
fameɉar/A
farsir/A
faxanar/A
notifegar/A
femenar/A
deferir/A
infervorar/A
sfiadar/A
infiaskar/A
fifotar/A
filoxofar/A
fiorar/A
fiscotar/A
konfluir/A
infoibar/A
konfónder/A
deformar/A
fornegar/A
fraɉar/A
frapolar/A
defraudar/A
frenar/A
sfrixar/A
fufiñar/A
sprofumar/A
fúxer/A
galdir/A
dexganbarar/A
xgarbar/A
xgarujar/A
gendoliđar/A
xgolar/A
gorgeđar/A
xgrameñar/A
dexgranfir/A
rengraŧiar/A
gremir/A
ingringolir/A
grixolir/A
gruar/A
malgualivar/A
xguindolar/A
ibridar/A
inestar/A
inpedir/A
integrar/A
invidiar/A
jaŧar/A
ɉelar/A
dexɉoŧar/A
skàder/A
inkaɉar/A
skalkañar/A
skalŧar/A
skanar/A
inkankarar/A
inkantar/A
inkaparar/A
skapriŧiar/A
skarkajar/A
inkaroñar/A
inkartoŧar/A
inkastrar/A
katekiđar/A
kauteriđar/A
skaveɉar/A
esklúder/A
deskojonar/A
perkolar/A
koltivar/A
skomunegar/A
konglomerar/A
konpónder/A
kontinuar/A
kòñer/A
sokórer/A
inakòrđer/A
skorporar/A
inkotolar/A
koxenar/A
skreventar/A
kronpar/A
inkrukar/A
kubiar/A
kufolar/A
skular/A
skurtar/A
lakoniđar/A
xlanŧar/A
tralasar/A
xlavrar/A
dexleguar/A
elevar/A
relievar/A
lindar/A
lokar/A
dexlontanar/A
xlubiar/A
xlúxer/A
dexmagrar/A
mamalukar/A
maneđar/A
mañaŧar/A
margotar/A
masar/A
mastruŧar/A
inmaŧetar/A
frameđar/A
xmalmenar/A
xmeolar/A
deméter/A
sotométer/A
dexminconar/A
inmixerir/A
molar/A
remondar/A
inmorar/A
remorkiar/A
dexmostrar/A
inmucarar/A
premunir/A
inmutir/A
xnarocar/A
nebiar/A
dexniar/A
nomenar/A
anular/A
obedir/A
okar/A
onbriđar/A
orir/A
orinar/A
ostiar/A
inpacugar/A
spaɉar/A
spaleŧar/A
panar/A
panŧar/A
konparir/A
straparlar/A
pasar/A
inpastar/A
patriar/A
inpaveɉar/A
rapegar/A
inpelugar/A
sospénder/A
inpensar/A
pèrder/A
personaliđar/A
inpetacar/A
petufar/A
despiantar/A
inpicolar/A
spikolir/A
pionbinar/A
spisakiar/A
piŧolar/A
pocar/A
spolverar/A
konpóner/A
spongar/A
pontiđar/A
asportar/A
konpostar/A
depoxitar/A
inpresar/A
prexúmer/A
despropiar/A
espuñar/A
inputridir/A
radobar/A
ranbar/A
ranŧinar/A
raxonar/A
regatar/A
retribuir/A
rigolar/A
robar/A
surogar/A
ronkir/A
rostir/A
ruelar/A
rutar/A
desagrar/A
resalir/A
saltelar/A
saorir/A
insavonar/A
scopiđar/A
sekuestrar/A
prosèguer/A
konseɉar/A
senpiar/A
raseñar/A
konservar/A
sfraxenar/A
siɉilar/A
insiñir/A
skaɉar/A
skarpelar/A
iskaturir/A
skiŧetar/A
skravaŧar/A
skuarar/A
arsolar/A
asòlver/A
sopođar/A
sovenŧionar/A
spaxemar/A
sperimentar/A
spifarar/A
traspirar/A
sporkacar/A
malstar/A
stalir/A
staŧar/A
stigar/A
istituir/A
istolidir/A
stranxir/A
istrigar/A
strukar/A
destudar/A
sublimar/A
asunar/A
sutilir/A
intaɉar/A
tamusar/A
tapeŧar/A
tarokar/A
destavelar/A
desténder/A
tenpestar/A
stentar/A
manteñir/A
sostèñer/A
terar/A
destèser/A
tinbrar/A
tiviar/A
tonbar/A
intorbiar/A
destortiɉar/A
toxar/A
tradir/A
tranxar/A
tratiđar/A
instremir/A
strikolar/A
tronbetar/A
truskar/A
ŧakolar/A
konŧéder/A
ŧénđer/A
ŧertar/A
ŧigalar/A
postiŧipar/A
inŧopar/A
dexumanar/A
reuxar/A
validar/A
vanŧar/A
vedar/A
xvejar/A
revénder/A
veñir/A
soraveñir/A
sovèñer/A
inveriar/A
divertir/A
stravestir/A
videgar/A
virar/A
vivakiar/A
invokar/A
xvoltar/A
vomitar/A
xaudir/A
xbrumar/A
inxerir/A
xɉaventar/A
xñikar/A
xurlar/A
